Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-406. Retirement fund assets accounts — Members' deposit account — Contributions.

The members' deposit account is the account:

In which member contributions are accumulated;

From which member refunds of contributions are paid; and

From which transfers are made as provided in this act.

Employer contributions that are paid by an employee instead of an employer shall be:

Credited to the members' deposit account; and

Subject to refund under the same conditions that regular member contributions are refunded.

In the event survivor benefits become payable on account of the death of a member, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account shall be transferred to the survivor benefit account.

Except as provided otherwise in this section, the contributions of a member to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be the amounts set forth in this subsection.

Each member who first became a member July 1, 1971, or later shall contribute to the system six percent (6%) of his or her salary for all salary earned on or before June 30, 2013.

Beginning July 1, 2013, each member who first became a member July 1, 1971, or later shall contribute to the system the percentage of his or her salary set by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under subdivision (b)(8) of this section.

Member contributions before July 1, 1969, shall be in accordance with provisions in force before July 1, 1969.

For each member who first became a member before July 1, 1971, member contributions for the period after June 30, 1969, shall be six percent (6%) of the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of his or her annual salary through June 30, 2013, unless he or she shall have elected, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, to contribute six percent (6%) of his or her full salary for the period after June 30, 1969, through June 30, 2013.

Beginning July 1, 2013, each member who first became a member before July 1, 1971, shall contribute to the system the percentage of salary set by the board under subdivision (b)(8) of this section on the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of his or her annual salary unless he or she elects to contribute a percentage of his or her entire salary, in accordance with the rules established by the board.

If the election is made before July 1, 1984, the member shall contribute to the system the difference between full salary member contributions and member contributions based on seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) annual covered salary retroactive to July 1, 1969, or to the actual date of employment, whichever is later, by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

If the election is made July 1, 1984, or later, the member shall contribute to the system both the added member contributions and the added employer contributions that would have been paid to the system if the member's full salary always had been covered by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

The interest and added employer contributions shall be considered member contributions for purposes of the system. However, any former active member who returns to covered employment on or after July 1, 1995, and who elects to make contributions to the system, shall contribute on his or her full salary.

Members who leave covered employment and who had annual compensation of seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) or less shall have, upon their return to covered employment, full salary considered for purposes of the system.

Contributions shall be required on all salary earned in covered employment during the fiscal year in which membership begins.

The member contribution rate shall be six percent (6%) unless increased by the board.

Subject to the limitations under subdivision (b)(8)(D) of this section, the board may set the member contribution rate at no less than six percent (6%) and may increase the member contribution rate to maintain actuarial soundness.

An increase or decrease in a member contribution rate shall:

Apply to a complete fiscal year; and

Remain in effect until modified by the board.

The board may adopt a change in the member contribution rate by resolution at any board meeting to apply to subsequent fiscal years until changed.

The board shall not increase the member contribution rate unless the:

System's actuary certifies to the board that the amortization period to pay the unfunded liabilities of the system exceeds eighteen (18) years; and

Board determines that an increase in the member contribution rate is prudent to maintain actuarial soundness.

Each employer shall deduct the member contributions provided for in this section from the salary of each member on every payroll, for every payroll period, from the date of his or her entrance into the system until the member retires or terminates, and the employer shall remit the contributions to the system.

Before July 1, 2011, if the employer fails to report the required service of a member and remit the contributions to the system, the system shall have the right to collect from the employee and the employer the contributions due, if any, from each, together with interest beginning with the subsequent fiscal year if the unreported service is within the look-back period under § 24-7-205.

If the unreported service is not within the look-back period, the unreported required service shall be considered an optional purchase of service and the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits due to the system shall be required by the member.

A member shall not be given credit for service rendered until all service is paid in full.

The member's contributions provided for in this section shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum salary provided by law for any member shall be thereby changed.

Each member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for in this section.

Payment of his or her salary less the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by the member during the period covered by the payment, except as to benefits provided by the system.

The members' contributions, so deducted from their salaries, shall be remitted to the system in such manner and form and into such frequency and shall be accompanied by such supporting data as the board shall prescribe from time to time.

In addition to the contributions deducted from the salaries of a member, as provided in this section, a member may restore contributory, noncontributory, and any other service credit forfeited in a member termination refund by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits.

A member shall not be given credit for service rendered before the date the member received a refund of contributions until the member returns to the system all amounts due from the member.

Effective July 1, 1999, an active member shall:

Elect to become a contributory or noncontributory member of the system as provided for in this section; and

File a written election with the system in accordance with the rules adopted by the board.

The election of the member:

Is irrevocable; and

Shall be made on or before July 1, 2000.

If a member does not make an election, then the status of the member on June 30, 2000:

Remains in effect;

Is irrevocable.

The election of a member to become a contributory or noncontributory member of the system:

Applies only to the future salaries of a member of the system;

Does not alter the contribution requirements of a member; and

Does not alter the status of member contributions that existed before the election.

An active member who previously elected to become a noncontributory member of the system may change credited service on which a member contribution has not been paid to contributory credited service by paying the system the actuarial equivalent of the member benefits.

If a member previously made contributions to only the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of his or her annual salary, then the member cannot contribute on a full future salary until the member makes additional contributions to previous full salaries as provided under this section.

Effective July 1, 2005, an active member whose status later changes from a nonteacher status to an administrator or teacher status under contract for one hundred eighty-one (181) days or more shall become a contributory member of the system otherwise provided for in this section regardless of an earlier election to be a noncontributory member of the system.

From July 1, 2005, to June 30, 2007, an active member who has previously elected to be a noncontributory member of the system may make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system.

If the election is made before the preparation of the first salary payment to the member in the fiscal year, the election is effective immediately.

If the election is made after the preparation of the first payroll containing the first salary payment to the member in the fiscal year, the election is effective July 1 of the next fiscal year.

On and after July 1, 2007, an active member who has previously been a noncontributory member of the system, by election or otherwise, may make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system under this section.

Effective July 1, 1999, an inactive member who reenters the system shall elect to become a contributory or noncontributory member of the system within one (1) year of the effective date that the member is considered an active member of the system.

The election is effective the earlier of the:

Preparation of the payroll containing the first salary payment upon the reentry of the member into the system; or

July 1 immediately following the date the election is filed with the system.

If the member does not make an election within one (1) year, then the status of the member before the member reentered the system remains in effect.

Effective July 1, 2007, an inactive member who becomes an active member of the system shall reenter as a contributory member of the system if the member was contributory when he or she first entered the inactive status.

Effective July 1, 2007, an inactive member or a rescinding retiree who reenters the system may make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system under this section at the time of his or her reemployment regardless of his or her previous noncontributory status.

If the election is made:

Before the preparation of the first salary payment to the member in the fiscal year, the election is effective immediately; and

After the preparation of the first payroll containing the first salary payment to the member in the fiscal year, the election is effective July 1 of the next fiscal year.

Effective July 1, 1999, a new member shall be a contributory member of the system.(B) From July 1, 1999, to June 30, 2007, a new member who is under contract with a covered employer for one hundred eighty (180) days or less shall have one (1) year to make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system.

The board may exclude the participation of a member under this subsection if the board determines that the contributions of a member may not be treated as employer contributions under the:

Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.; or

Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq.

The board shall interpret this subsection in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of the:

Internal Revenue Code; and

Applicable United States Department of the Treasury regulations under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a).

Employees who are eligible for membership in the system under § 24-7-202, who are or have been erroneously enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, whose membership in that system is cancelled, and whose employee or employer contributions are refunded by that system under §§ 24-2-301 — 24-2-305, shall make member contributions to the system as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

If such an employee becomes an active member of the contributory plan of this system, he or she may establish contributory service credit for all or part of his or her service that is cancelled by the system by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

Each employer shall pay the member contributions under this section from the salary earned by a member after June 30, 1997, and those contributions shall then be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., and the Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq.

For service purchase accounts established before July 1, 2011, that have an irrevocable payroll authorization established before July 1, 2012, or for accounts established by the system to allow a member to make payments on unreported or incorrectly reported contributory service, a member may elect to establish past service through payroll deductions, and the employer shall pay the amount required to establish the past service from the employee's salary earned after the employee signs an irrevocable payroll authorization prescribed by the board, and those payments shall then be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2011, and the Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq.

Each employer shall continue to withhold federal and state income taxes based upon those contributions as income of the member until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(h), the contributions shall not be included as gross income of the member until they are distributed or made available to the member.

The employer shall pay these member contributions from the same source of funds used in paying the salary to the member. The employer may pay these contributions by a reduction in the cash salary of the member, by a setoff against future salary increases, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and a setoff against future salary increases.

If member contributions are paid by the employer as provided under this subsection, they shall be treated for all purposes of the system in the same manner and to the same extent possible as member contributions made prior to the date the employer began payment of the member's contributions hereunder.

Whenever member contributions are required to be paid by the employer under this subsection, the employee shall not have the option of choosing to receive the contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer.

(C)

From July 1, 1999, to June 30, 2007, a new member who is not under contract with a covered employer shall not become a contributory member of the system.

(D)(i)

Effective July 1, 2007, a new member under contract with a covered employer for one hundred eighty-one (181) days or more shall be a contributory member of the system.

(ii)

A new member under contract with a covered employer for one hundred eighty (180) days or less may make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system.

(iii)

A new member not under contract with a covered employer may make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the system under this section.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; 1975, No. 549, § 4; 1977, No. 541, § 3; 1981, No. 365, § 4; 1981, No. 435, § 1; 1983, No. 619, § 7; 1983, No. 665, § 7; 1985, No. 504, § 2; 1985, No. 805, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442; Acts 1989, No. 821, § 8; 1989, No. 652, § 3; 1991, No. 14, § 1; 1991, No. 43, § 2; 1993, No. 435, §§ 4, 5; 1995, No. 460, § 2; 1995, No. 542, §§ 2, 3; 1997, No. 206, § 1; 1997, No. 393, § 1; 1999, No. 11, § 2; 1999, No. 81, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 864, § 1; 1999, No. 907, §§ 1, 2, 4; 2001, No. 155, § 3; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 23, § 1; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 47, § 1; 2005, No. 385, § 2; 2007, No. 93, § 1; 2009, No. 468, §§ 7-9; 2011, No. 41, § 2; 2011, No. 69, §§ 5-10; 2013, No. 602, § 1; 2017, No. 550, § 1; 2019, No. 297, § 2; 2019, No. 427, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (f)(5) took effect “beginning July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1999, No. 81, §§ 1 and 2 were repealed by Acts 1999, No. 907, § 4.

Acts 1999, No. 81, § 1, amended (f) and (g) to read as follows:

“(f)(1)

Active members as of July 1, 1999, shall elect by written election filed with the system in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board to eliminate future member contributions or to make member contributions otherwise provided for in this section. The election shall be irrevocable and shall be made on or before July 1, 2000. If no election is made, the member's status on June 30, 2000, shall be in effect and shall be irrevocable.

“(2)

For a former inactive member, the election shall be made within one (1) year of the effective date the member is considered an active member. The election shall be effective the earlier of the preparation of the payroll containing the first salary payment upon re-entry or the July 1 next following the date the election is filed with the system. If no election is made within one (1) year, the member's status prior to reentry will remain in effect.

“(3)(A)

If the election is to eliminate member contributions, then the election shall apply only to future member salaries and shall not change the status of any member contributions made before the election. If the election is to eliminate member contributions, then the election shall apply only to future member salaries and shall not change the status of any member contributions made before the election.

“(B)(i)

If the effect of the election is to require member contributions, then the election shall apply only to future member salaries and shall not change any member contribution requirements existing before the election.

“(ii)

If a member has previously contributed on only the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of his annual salary, he cannot contribute on full future salaries until he has made added contributions on past full salaries as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

“(4)(A)

After July 1, 1999, all new members shall make the member contributions otherwise provided for in this section.

“(B)

After July 1, 1999, an employee who worked less than thirty (30) days during the previous fiscal year shall not make member contributions as provided in this section.

“(g)(1)

Employees who are eligible for membership in the system under § 24-7-202, who are or have been erroneously enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, whose membership in that system is cancelled, and whose employee or employer contributions are refunded by that system under §§ 24-2-301 — 24-2-305, shall make member contributions to the system as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

“(2)

If such an employee becomes an active member of the contributory plan of this system, he or she may establish contributory credit for all or part of his service that is cancelled by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by paying both the employee and employer contributions required by this system plus regular interest.”

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, the amendment of this section by Acts 1999, No. 864 is deemed to be superseded by the amendment by Acts 1999, No. 907. Acts 1999, No. 864, § 1, amended (f) to read as follows:

“(f)(1)

Each member may elect by written election filed with the system in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board to eliminate future member contributions otherwise provided for in this section.

“(2)

For a new member, the election shall become a binding agreement upon its effective date if the election is so filed before preparation of the payroll containing his first salary payment, but in no event before July 1, 1986.

“(3)

Beginning July 1, 1993, any member may change his election concerning member contributions once each fiscal year. Beginning July 1, 1997, the election shall be effective the July 1 immediately preceding its filing provided it is received by the system before October 1 of the current fiscal year.

“(4)(A)

If the election is to eliminate member contributions, then the election shall apply only to future member salaries and shall not change the status of any member contributions made before the election. Beginning July 1, 1999, an active member who has previously elected to eliminate member contributions, by paying the additional member contributions due plus interest from the dates the contributions would have been received by the system to the date of the payment in full, may change credited service on which no member contributions have been paid to member contributions credited service.

“(B)(i)

If the effect of the election is to require member contributions, then the election shall apply only to future member salaries and shall not change any member contribution requirements existing before the election.

“(ii)

However, if a member has previously contributed on only the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of his annual salary, he cannot contribute on full future salaries until he has made added contributions on past full salaries as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

“(5)(A)

All new members, including any former active members, shall not make the member contributions otherwise provided for in this section.

“(B)(i)

Those members may elect, by written election filed with the system in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board, to make contributions as provided for in this section.

“(ii)

(a)

The election shall become a binding agreement upon its effective date if the election is so filed with the system before the preparation of the payroll containing his first salary payment.

“

(b)

In all other circumstances, the election shall be effective the July 1 immediately following the filing of the election.

“(6)(A)

For a new member who files in compliance with subdivisions (f)(1) or (f)(5) of this section, the effective date shall be the date the first paycheck is received.

“(B)

In all other circumstances, the effective date shall be July 1.”

The amendment of this section by Acts 2009, No. 468, § 8, omitted former subdivisions (c)(1)(A)(ii) and (c)(1)(B) without striking through the language to indicate the repeal of that language.

Acts 2019, No. 297, § 1, provided: “Legislative history, findings, and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Member contributions as a portion of the salary of an individual employed by a school or an educational institution has been a historical component of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System since 1937;

“(2)

Acts 1937, No. 266 created the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to manage contributions made by teachers to the retirement system in order to ensure that every teacher receives an annuity upon his or her retirement;

“(3)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act originally required a teacher to contribute four percent (4%) of his or her salary to fund the investment of the retirement system in the retirement of the teacher;

“(4)

When the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act was first enacted, every teacher:

“(A)

Had to contribute to the retirement system; and

“(B)

Was enrolled as a contributory member of the retirement system;

“(5)

Throughout the eighty-one (81) year history of the retirement system, the law has been amended multiple times to either allow a member to opt-in or opt-out of his or her contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system as follows:

“(A)

From the time the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act was first enacted until 1986, the provisions of the act did not provide an option for a member to become a noncontributory member that was consistent with the design of the retirement system;

“(B)

Acts 1985, No. 504 allowed a new member of the retirement system to elect whether he or she would participate as a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system, and if the member did not make an election, the member was enrolled as a contributory member of the retirement system;

“(C)

Amendments to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act that occurred between 1986 and 1991 added new categories of employees from various state agencies or eligibility requirements that affected the reporting or classifications of the employees;

“(D)

Acts 1989, No. 821 allowed a member of the retirement system to make a one-time additional election to become a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system;

“(E)

Effective July 1, 1991, a new member of the retirement system was enrolled as a noncontributory member of the retirement system and could elect to become a contributory member of the retirement system.

“(F)

Additionally, effective July 1, 1991, if a member became an inactive member who later returned to the retirement system, the member was enrolled as a noncontributory member of the retirement system with the option of electing to become a contributory member of the retirement system;

“(G)

Similar to Acts 1985, No. 504, Acts 1991, No. 14 allowed new and returning members to the retirement system to be enrolled as noncontributory members of the retirement system with the option of electing to become a contributory member of the retirement system;

“(H)

Acts 1993, No. 435, effective July 1, 1993, allowed a member to annually change his or her status from a:

“(i)

Contributory to noncontributory member of the retirement system; or

“(ii)

Noncontributory to contributory member of the retirement system;

“(I)

Acts 1995, No. 332 added more state agency employees to the retirement system while Acts 1995, No. 542 changed the amount of service an employee was required to have before he or she could become an active member of the retirement system;

“(J)

Acts 1997, No. 393 amended the annual election window of a member to be effective for July 1 of the year of the election if the member made the election before October of that same year;

“(K)

Acts 1999, No. 81, effective July 1, 1999, eliminated the noncontributory option for a new member and allowed a current member a one-time irrevocable option to become either a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system;

“(L)

Acts 1999, No. 81 set a different requirement for an election to become either a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system that was based on the status of the member as an active, inactive, or new member of the retirement system;

“(M)

Acts 1999, No. 907 repealed Acts 1999, No. 81 and allowed certain members to retain the option to elect either contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system;

“(N)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System notified the members of the retirement system of the election permitted under Acts 1999, No. 907, and allowed a member with service credit as of June 30, 1998 to make a final election to become a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system by June 30, 2000;

“(O)

Acts 2003, No. 23 allowed an active member who previously elected a noncontributory status to make an irrevocable election to become a contributory member of the retirement system;

“(P)

Additionally, Acts 2003, No. 23 required the length of a contract between a member and school to determine the:

“(i)

Status of a member as a contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system; and

“(ii)

Right of a member to elect a contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system;

“(Q)

Acts 2003, No. 23 permitted a member who transferred from employment as a nonteacher to employment as a teacher with a contract of one hundred eighty-one (181) days or more to become a contributory member of the retirement system regardless of a previous election made by the member;

“(R)

Effective July 1, 2005, Acts 2005, No. 385 provided an active member who previously elected to become a noncontributory member of the retirement system with the option of irrevocably electing to become a contributory member of the retirement system; and

“(S)

Effective July 1, 2007, Acts 2007, No. 93 provided a member with an option to elect to be a contributory member depending on whether the member was:

“(i)

An active, non-contributory member of the retirement system;

“(ii)

An inactive member or a rescinding retiree reentering the retirement system; or

“(iii)

A new member of the retirement system under contract for one hundred eighty (180) days or less;

“(6)

The right of a member to elect a contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system has not been amended since the passage of Acts 2007, No. 93;

“(7)

Myriad legislative amendments have continuously changed the ability of a member of the retirement system to become a revocable or irrevocable contributory or noncontributory member of the retirement system;

“(8)

The classification of a member as an active, an inactive, or a new member of the retirement system affects the right of a member to elect a contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system;

“(9)

The incorporation of the various legislative amendments into the Arkansas Code has created challenging subsections and subdivisions of the law through which the retirement system must determine the status of a member based on when the member first:

“(A)

Enrolled in the retirement system;

“(B)

Returned to the retirement system; or

“(C)

Elected a different status in the retirement system;

“(10)

The election of a contributory or noncontributory status in the retirement system affects the retirement benefit calculation for a member;

“(11)

A restructuring of § 24-7-406(e) concerning the contributory or noncontributory status of a member of the retirement system is intended to retain existing law without impairing, broadening, or changing the applicability of § 24-7-406(e) to the current status of a member;

“(12)

The purpose of the amendment to § 24-7-406(e) is to simplify the current language and application of the statute to the current contributory or noncontributory status of a member of the retirement system, so that the retirement system may correctly and efficiently manage records pertaining to a member; and

“(13)

Therefore, a restructuring of § 24-7-406(e) is necessary to:

“(A)

Accurately and logically organize the language of the statute in order to prevent ambiguity of the law and allow the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to administer vested benefits and manage the accounts of its members;

“(B)

Clarify the existing provisions under § 24-7-406(e) so that the provisions may be correctly interpreted and efficiently managed by the retirement system;

“(C)

Preserve and retain existing law regarding the vested contributory or noncontributory status of a member of the retirement system;

“(D)

Neither expand nor contract a current vested or nonvested contributory or noncontributory status of a member of the retirement system; and

“(E)

Provide a logical framework for a future amendment to § 24-7-406(e)”.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (a)(1); inserted “or terminates:” in (c)(1)(A)(i); inserted “to reestablish credit for refunded service” in (d)(1); substituted “the system's purchase of service credit provisions” for “§ 24-7-501(b), § 24-7-502(b)(5), § 24-7-610, § 24-7-611, or §§ 24-7-602 - 24-7-607” in (g)(1)(B); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 41 deleted “with regular interest” from the end of (a)(1)(A).

The 2011 amendment by No. 69 substituted “shall contribute to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “must contribute to the system” in (b)(4)(B); substituted “by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system” for “plus interest from the dates the added contributions would normally have been received by the system to the date of the actual added contributions” in (b)(4)(B) and (C);
in (c)(1)(B)(i), substituted “Before July 1, 2011, if the employer fails to report the required service” for “Should the employer fail at any time to report the salary” and added “if the unreported service is within the look-back period under § 24-7-205”; inserted present (c)(1)(B)(ii) and redesignated former (c)(1)(B)(ii) as (c)(1)(B)(iii); substituted “service is” for “contributions and interest due from each are” in present (c)(1)(B)(iii); substituted “restore contributory, noncontributory, and any other service credit forfeited in a member termination refund by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits” for “deposit into the system, by a single contribution or by an increased rate of contributions as approved by the board, the amounts the member received in a refund of contributions and not repaid, together with interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment to reestablish credit for refunded service” in (d)(1); substituted “contributory credited service by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system” for “member contributions credited service by paying the additional member contributions due plus interest from the dates the contributions would have been received by the system to the date of the payment in full” in (e)(3)(A)(ii); in (f)(2), inserted “service” following “establish contributory” and substituted “the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system” for “both the employee and employer contributions required by
this system plus interest”; and rewrote (g)(1)(B).

The 2013 amendment
substituted “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “system” in (b)(1); redesignated (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A) and added “for all salary earned on or before June 30, 2013” at the end; inserted (b)(2)(B); inserted “through June 30, 2013” twice in (b)(4)(A);
inserted (b)(4)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted
“system” for “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” in present (b)(4)(C); and added (b)(7) and (b)(8) at the end.

The 2017 amendment rewrote (b)(8)(A); added “to apply to subsequent fiscal years until changed” in (b)(8)(C); and rewrote (b)(8)(D).

The 2019 amendment by No. 297 rewrote (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 427 substituted “leave covered employment” for “left covered employment before July 1, 1985” in (b)(5).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.

24-7-407. Retirement fund assets accounts — Employer accumulation account.

The employer accumulation account is the account in which shall be accumulated the employer's contributions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, and from which shall be made transfers as provided in this act.

Upon the retirement of a member, the difference between his or her annuity reserve and his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at that time shall be transferred from the employer accumulation account to the retirement reserve account.

Upon the death of a member, if survivor benefits become payable on account of his or her death, the difference between the reserve for the survivor benefits payable and the member's accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her death shall be transferred from the employer accumulation account to the survivor benefit account.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.

24-7-408. Retirement fund assets accounts — Retirement reserve account.

The retirement reserve account shall be the account from which shall be paid all annuities and benefits in lieu of annuities payable as provided in this act to retirants who retired on account of superannuation or disability and to beneficiaries of such retirants.

If a disability retirant returns to teaching service:

The amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be transferred from the retirement reserve account to the members' deposit account; and

The remainder of his or her annuity reserve at the time of return shall be transferred from the retirement reserve account to the employer accumulation account.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; 1979, No. 681, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.

24-7-409. Retirement fund assets accounts — Survivor benefit account.

The survivor benefit account shall be the account from which shall be paid survivor benefits payable as provided in this act.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; 1981, No. 365, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.

24-7-410. Retirement fund assets accounts — Income-expense account.

The income-expense account shall be the account to which shall be credited all investment income from invested assets of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. It shall also be the account in which shall be accumulated the contributions made by employers for the administrative expenses of the system and from which shall be made annual transfers of interest credits to the other accounts of the system and from which shall be paid all the expenses of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System necessary for the administration and operation of the system.

The board may accept gifts and bequests, which shall be credited to the income-expense account along with all other moneys received by the system the disposition of which is not specifically provided for in this act.

Each year, the General Assembly shall appropriate the amounts of money certified by the board as required to pay the proper administrative expenses of the system.

[Repealed.]

Whenever the board determines that the balance in the income-expense account is more than sufficient to cover the current charges to the account, the board may, by resolution, provide for contingency reserves, or for the transfer of the excess, or portions thereof, to cover the needs of the other accounts of the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; 1979, No. 681, § 4; 1983, No. 619, § 12; 1983, No. 665, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 43;
2015, No. 301, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c), added “Each year,” deleted “for each biennium at each regular session” preceding “appropriate” and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment repealed (d).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-401.